Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.0251

Application of chapter to charter schools.

In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to any charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW. Any charter school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW is a separate employer from any school district, including the school district in which it is located.

[ 2023 c 102 s 29; 2016 c 241 s 137. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 307 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 241: See RCW 28A.710.901.